de: Kurbelspindelschnittstelle: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikanisch 1-teilig; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Vierkant (ISO); Vierkant (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Andere
th: ส่วนต่อประสานแกนข้อเหวี่ยง: 29 มม.; 386EVO; แกนอเมริกัน 1 ชิ้น; BB30 / 30 มม.; BBright 30; Cinch 30 มม.; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 มม.; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Square Taper (ISO); Square Taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; อื่นๆ
fi: Kampiakselin liitäntätyyppi: 29 mm; 386EVO; American (1-osainen); BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Nelikulma-akseli (ISO); Nelikulma-akseli (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Muu
nb: Veivspindelgrensesnitt: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikansk 1-delt; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Firkantaksel (ISO); Firkantaksel (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Annet
nl: Crankspil interface: 29 mm; 386EVO; American 1-piece; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Square Taper (ISO); Square Taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Overige
zh-CN: 曲柄轴接口: 29 mm; 386EVO; 美式 1 件套; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; 方孔 (ISO); 方孔 (JIS); Ultra-Torque; 其他
cs: Rozhraní osy kliky: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americké jednodílné; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profil 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Čtyřhran (ISO); Čtyřhran (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Ostatní
ro-RO: Interfața axului manivelei: 29 mm; 386EVO; American din 1 piesă; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Taper pătrat (ISO); Taper pătrat (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Altele
es: Interfaz del eje de la manivela: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americano de 1 pieza; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch de 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile de 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Eje cónico cuadrado (ISO); Eje cónico cuadrado (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Otro
sl-SI: Vmesnik osi pogona: 29 mm; 386EVO; Ameriški 1-delni; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Kvadratni profil (ISO); Kvadratni profil (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Drugo
ja: クランクスピンドルインターフェース: 29 mm; 386EVO; アメリカンワンピース; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; スクエアテーパー (ISO); スクエアテーパー (JIS); Ultra-Torque; その他
zh-TW: 曲柄軸介面: 29 mm; 386EVO; 美式單件; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS 傳動; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; 方形錐體 (ISO); 方形錐體 (JIS); Ultra-Torque; 其他
sv: Vevaxelns gränssnitt: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikansk 1-delad; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Fyrkantsaxel (ISO); Fyrkantsaxel (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Övrigt
en: Crank spindle interface: 29 mm; 386EVO; American 1-piece; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Square Taper (ISO); Square Taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Other
pt-PT: Interface do veio da cambota: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americano 1 peça; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Eixo quadrado (ISO); Eixo quadrado (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Outro
tr: Aynakol mil arabirimi: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikan 1 parçalı; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Kare mil (ISO); Kare mil (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Diğer
ko: 크랭크 스핀들 인터페이스: 29mm; 386EVO; 아메리칸 1피스; BB30 / 30mm; BBright 30; 신치(Cinch) 30mm; GXP; ISIS 드라이브; M30; 마빅 610 URD; MegaExo; 파워 스플라인; 프로파일 30mm; 스램 DUB; 시마노 할로우텍 II; 시마노 옥타링크; 사각 테이퍼(ISO); 사각 테이퍼(JIS); 울트라 토크; 기타
ru: Интерфейс шпинделя шатуна: 29 мм; 386EVO; American 1-piece; BB30 / 30 мм; BBright 30; Cinch 30 мм; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 мм; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Под квадрат (ISO); Под квадрат (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Другое
vi: Giao diện trục khuỷu: 29 mm; 386EVO; Hệ Mỹ liền khối; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; Truyền động ISIS; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Cốt Power Spline; Mặt cắt 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Trục vuông (ISO); Trục vuông (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Khác
hr-HR: Sučelje osovine radilice: 29 mm; 386EVO; Američki 1-dijelni; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Kvadratni konus (ISO); Kvadratni konus (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Ostalo
da: Krumtapspindlens kontaktflade: 29 mm; 386EVO; American 1-piece; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Firkant (ISO); Firkant (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Andet
fr: Interface de l’axe de pédalier: 29 mm; 386EVO; Américain 1 pièce; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Axe carré (ISO); Axe carré (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Autre
pl: Interfejs osi mechanizmu korbowego: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerykański 1-częściowy; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Kwadrat (ISO); Kwadrat (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Inne
lt-LT: Švaistiklio veleno sąsaja: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikietiška 1 dalies; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Kvadratinė ašis (ISO); Kvadratinė ašis (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Kita
sk-SK: Rozhranie kľukového vretena: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americké 1-dielne; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Štvorhran (ISO); Štvorhran (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Iné
el: Διεπαφή άξονα στροφάλου: 29 mm; 386EVO; American 1-piece; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Square Taper (ISO); Square Taper (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Άλλο
bg-BG: Интерфейс на манивелния шпиндел: 29 мм; 386EVO; American (1 част); BB30 / 30 мм; BBright 30; Cinch 30 мм; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 мм; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Квадратна ос (ISO); Квадратна ос (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Други
pt-BR: Interface do eixo do virabrequim: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americana de 1 peça; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch de 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Eixo quadrado (ISO); Eixo quadrado (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Outros
hu: Hajtótengely csatlakozója: 29 mm; 386EVO; Amerikai 1 részes; BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Négyszögtengelyes (ISO); Négyszögtengelyes (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Egyéb
it: Interfaccia perno manovella: 29 mm; 386EVO; Americano (1 pezzo); BB30 / 30 mm; BBright 30; Cinch 30 mm; GXP; ISIS Drive; M30; Mavic 610 URD; MegaExo; Power Spline; Profile 30 mm; SRAM DUB; Shimano Hollowtech II; Shimano Octalink; Perno quadro (ISO); Perno quadro (JIS); Ultra-Torque; Altro